pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Joga i pilates > Sprzęt do pilatesu > Krzesła do pilatesu: Akcesoria do krzeseł do pilatesu
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Yoga și Pilates > Aparate pentru Pilates > Scaune pentru Pilates: Accesorii pentru scaune de pilates
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Pilates et yoga > Machines pilates > Chaises Pilates: Accessoires de chaises de Pilates
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Joga ir pilatesas > Pilateso treniruokliai > Pilateso kėdės: Pilateso kėdžių priedai
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jooga ja pilates > Pilateslaitteet > Pilatestuolit: Pilatestuolien lisävarusteet
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Γιόγκα & Pilates > Μηχανήματα Pilates > Καρέκλες Pilates: Αξεσουάρ για καρέκλες πιλάτες
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Yoga och pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatesstolar: Tillbehör för pilatesstolar
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 瑜伽与普拉提 > 普拉提健身器 > 普拉提椅: 普拉提椅配件
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Jóga és pilátesz > Piláteszgépek > Piláteszszékek: Pilates-szék-kiegészítők
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Joga in pilates > Naprave za pilates > Stoli za pilates: Dodatki za stol za pilates
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates-Geräte > Pilates-Stühle: Zubehör für Pilates-Stühle
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Yoga e pilates > Macchine pilates > Sedie pilates: Accessori per sedie da pilates
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Joga a pilates > Vybavenie na pilates > Stoličky na pilates: Príslušenstvo k stoličke na pilates
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Yoga và Pilate > Máy tập thể dục > Ghế Pilate: Phụ kiện ghế tập pilates
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 요가/필라테스 > 필라테스 기구 > 필라테스 의자: 필라테스 체어 액세서리
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Ioga e pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Cadeiras de pilates: Acessórios para cadeiras de Pilates
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Yoga e Pilates > Aparelhos para pilates > Cadeiras de pilates: Acessórios para cadeiras de pilates
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Yoga y pilates > Máquinas de pilates > Sillas de pilates: Accesorios para sillas de pilates
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Jóga a pilates > Trenažéry na pilates > Pilates židle: Příslušenství k židlím na pilates
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Yoga en pilates > Pilatesapparaten > Pilatesstoelen: Accessoires voor pilatesstoelen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Машини за пилатес > Пилатес столове: Аксесоари за пилатес столове
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Yoga ve Pilates > Pilates Makineleri > Pilates Sandalyeleri: Pilates sandalyesi aksesuarları
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 瑜珈和皮拉提斯 > 皮拉提斯機 > 皮拉提斯椅: 皮拉提斯椅配件
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates Machines > Pilates Chairs: Pilates Chair Accessories
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > โยคะและพิลาทีส > เครื่องพิลาทีส > เก้าอี้พิลาทีส: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเก้าอี้พิลาทิส
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Тренажеры для пилатеса > Стулья для пилатеса: Аксессуары для стульев для пилатеса
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Joga i pilates > Sprave za pilates > Stolice za pilates: Dodaci za stolicu za pilates
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatesstole: Tilbehør til pilatesstole
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ヨガ・ピラティス > ピラティスマシン > ピラティスチェア: ピラティスチェアアクセサリー
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner > Pilatesstoler: Tilbehør til pilatesstoler